Wisconsin, session 2025, SB1125.
do enact as follows:SB1125,13Section 1. 1.12 (6) (a) of the statutes is renumbered 1.12 (6) (ar).SB1125,21Section 2. 1.12 (6) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:SB1125,2,821.12 (6) (ag) For mega transmission systems, consolidated utility corridors 3and high-voltage direct current systems or other underground facilities located 4with an existing high-voltage transmission line or within the right-of-way of an 5interstate highway, a U.S. numbered highway, a state trunk highway, or a railroad. 6In this paragraph, “mega transmission system” means a high-voltage transmission 7line, as defined in s. 196.491 (1) (f), designed for operation at a nominal voltage of 8more than 400 kilovolts.SB1125,2,99